Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-143
Legal notice; substitute notice; authorized.

If a legal notice required by any statute of this state cannot be purchased at the rate set forth in section 33-141 or at the fraction of that rate specified by the particular statute requiring the legal notice, the legal notice purchaser may substitute for published legal notice a form of legal notice which includes, but is not limited to, posting the notice for the full period specified in the statute at the place or places specified in the statute. If no place is specified, then the posting shall be in full public view at the regular meeting place or office of any public entity involved, at the place where the particular meeting, act, or event described by the notice is to occur, and on a public bulletin board in the municipal office building and the county office building of the municipality and county nearest to the place of the meeting, act, or event described in the notice.

Laws 1989, LB 298, § 3.